California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(c) In those instances in which the provisions of this division require the filing of a claim for the exemption, except as provided in subdivision (d), (e), or (f), any person claiming to be eligible for an exemption to be applied against the amount of the supplemental assessment shall file a claim or an amendment to a current claim, in that form as prescribed by the board, on or before the 30th day following the date of notice of the supplemental assessment, in order to receive a 100-percent exemption.

(1) With respect to property as to which the college, cemetery, church, religious, exhibition, veterans’ organization, free public libraries, free museums, or welfare exemption was available, but for which a timely application for exemption was not filed,
 the following amounts shall be canceled or refunded:

(A) Ninety percent of any tax or penalty or interest thereon, or any amount of tax or penalty or interest thereon exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250) in total amount, whichever is greater, for each supplemental assessment, provided that an appropriate application for exemption is filed on or before the date on which the first installment of taxes on the supplemental tax bill becomes delinquent, as provided by Section 75.52.

(B) Eighty-five percent of any tax or penalty or interest thereon, or any amount of tax or penalty or interest thereon exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250) in total amount, whichever is greater, for each supplemental assessment, if an appropriate application for exemption is thereafter filed.

(2) With respect to property as to which
 the welfare exemption or veterans’ organization exemption was available, all provisions of Section 254.5, other than the specified dates for the filing of affidavits and other acts, are applicable to this section.

(3) With respect to property as to which the veterans’ or homeowners’ exemption was available, but for which a timely application for exemption was not filed, that portion of tax attributable to 80 percent of the amount of exemption available shall be canceled or refunded, provided that an appropriate application for exemption is filed on or before the date on which the first installment of taxes on the supplemental tax bill becomes delinquent, as provided by Section 75.52.

(4) With respect to property as to which the disabled veterans’ exemption was available, but for which a timely application for exemption was not filed, that portion of tax attributable to 90 percent
 of the amount of exemption available shall be canceled or refunded, provided that an appropriate application for exemption is filed on or before the date on which the first installment of taxes on the supplemental tax bill becomes delinquent, as provided by Section 75.52. If an appropriate application for exemption is thereafter filed, 85 percent of the amount of the exemption available shall be canceled or refunded.

(5) With respect to property as to which any other exemption was available, but for which a timely application for exemption was not filed, the following amounts shall be canceled or refunded:

(A) Ninety percent of any tax or penalty or interest thereon, provided that an appropriate application for exemption is filed on or before the date on which the first installment of taxes on the supplemental tax bill becomes delinquent, as provided by Section 75.52.

(B) Eighty-five percent of any tax or penalty or interest thereon, or any amount of tax or penalty or interest thereon exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250) in total amount, whichever is greater, for each supplemental assessment, if an appropriate application for exemption is thereafter filed.

Other provisions of this division pertaining to the late filing of claims for exemption do not apply to assessments made pursuant to this chapter.

(d) For purposes of this section, any claim for the homeowners’ exemption, veterans’ exemption, or disabled veterans’ exemption previously filed by the owner of a dwelling, granted and in effect, constitutes the claim or claims for that exemption required in this section. In the event that a claim for the homeowners’ exemption, veterans’ exemption, or disabled veterans’ exemption is not in effect, a
 claim for any of those exemptions for a single supplemental assessment for a change in ownership or new construction occurring on or after June 1, up to and including December 31, shall apply to that assessment; a claim for any of those exemptions for the two supplemental assessments for a change in ownership or new construction occurring on or after January 1, up to and including May 31, one for the current fiscal year and one for the following fiscal year, shall apply to those assessments. In either case, if granted, the claim shall remain in effect until title to the property changes, the owner does not occupy the home as their principal place of residence on the lien date, or the property is otherwise ineligible pursuant to Section 205, 205.5, or 218.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), an additional exemption claim may not be required to be filed until the next succeeding lien date in the case in which a supplemental assessment results from the completion of new construction on property that has previously been granted exemption on either the current roll or the roll being prepared.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), an additional exemption claim is not required to be filed in the instance where a supplemental assessment results from a change in ownership of property where the purchaser of the property owns and uses or uses, as the case may be, other property that has been granted the college,
 public school, cemetery, church, religious, exhibition, veterans’ organization, free public libraries, free museums, or welfare exemption on either the current roll or the roll being prepared and the property purchased is put to the same use.

(2) In all other instances where a supplemental assessment results from a change in ownership of property, an application for exemption shall be filed pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 72, Sec. 2.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

75.22.

A property shall be eligible for exemption from the supplemental assessment if the person claiming the exemption meets the qualifications for the exemption established by this part no later than 90 days after the date of the change in ownership or the completion of new construction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 946, Sec. 7.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

75.24.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 75.22, a property shall be eligible for exemption from the supplemental assessment if the organization claiming the exemption is a qualified organization and meets the qualifications for the exemption established by this part no later than 180 days after the date of the change in ownership or the completion of new construction.

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified organization” means an organization that qualifies as an exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 201, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Notice of Assessment [75.31. - 75.32.]

75.31.

(a) Whenever the assessor has determined a new base year value as provided in Section 75.10, the assessor shall send a notice to the assessee showing the following:

(1) The new base year value of the property that has changed ownership, or the new base year value of the completed new construction that shall be added to the existing taxable value of the remainder of the property.

(2) The taxable value appearing on the current roll, and if the change in ownership or completion of new construction occurred between January 1 and May 31, the taxable value on the roll being prepared.

(3) The date of the change in ownership or completion of new construction.

(4) The amount of the supplemental assessments.

(5) The exempt amount, if any, on the current roll or the roll being prepared.

(6) The date the notice was mailed.

(7) A statement that the supplemental assessment was determined in accordance with Article XIIIA of the California Constitution that generally requires reappraisal of property whenever a change in ownership occurs or property is newly constructed.

(8) Any other information which the board may prescribe.

(b) In
 addition to the information specified in subdivision (a), the notice shall inform the assessee of the procedure for filing a claim for exemption that is to be filed within 30 days of the date of the notice.

(c) (1) The notice shall advise the assessee of the right to an informal review and the right to appeal the supplemental assessment, and, unless subject to paragraph (2) or (3), that the appeal shall be filed within 60 days of the date of mailing printed on the notice or the postmark date therefor, whichever is later. For the purposes of equalization proceedings, the supplemental assessment shall be considered an assessment made outside of the regular assessment period as provided in Section 1605.

(2) For counties in which the board of supervisors has adopted the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 1605, and the County of Los Angeles, the notice shall
 advise the assessee of the right to appeal the supplemental assessment, and that the appeal shall, except as provided in paragraph (3), be filed within 60 days of the date of mailing printed on the tax bill or the postmark date therefor, whichever is later. For the purposes of equalization proceedings, the supplemental assessment shall be considered an assessment made outside of the regular assessment period as provided in Section 1605.

(3) (A) If the taxpayer does not receive a notice in accordance with paragraph (1) at least 15 days prior to the deadline to file the application described in Section 1603, the affected party or his or her agent may file an application within 60 days of the date of mailing printed on the tax bill or the postmark thereof, whichever is later, along with an affidavit declaring under penalty of perjury that the notice was not timely received.

(B) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subdivision, an application for reduction in a supplemental assessment may be filed within 12 months following the month in which the assessee is notified of that assessment, if the affected party or his or her agent and the assessor stipulate that there is an error in assessment as the result of the exercise of the assessor’s judgment in determining the full cash value of the property and a written stipulation as to the full cash value and the assessed value is filed in accordance with Section 1607.

(d) The notice shall advise the assessee of both of the following:

(1) The requirements, procedures, and deadlines with respect to an application for the reduction of a base year value pursuant to Section 80, or the reduction of an assessment pursuant to Section 1603.

(2) The criteria under Section 51 for the determination of taxable value, and the requirement of Section 1602 that the custodial officer of the local roll make the roll, or a copy thereof, available for inspection by all interested parties during regular office hours.

(e) The notice shall advise the assessee that if the supplemental assessment is a negative amount the auditor shall make a refund of a portion of taxes paid on assessments made on the current roll, or the roll being prepared, or both.

(f) The notice shall be furnished by the assessor to the assessee by regular United States mail directed to the assessee at the assessee’s latest address known to the assessor. The assessor may choose to accept a written request from the assessee to provide the information by electronic mail in lieu of by regular United States
 mail.

(g) The notice given by the assessor under this section shall be on a form approved by the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 185, Sec. 1.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

75.32.

The failure of the assessee to receive a notice required by Section 75. 31 shall not affect the validity of any assessment or the validity of any taxes levied pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 946, Sec. 10.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Transmittal of Supplemental Assessments to the Auditor [75.40. - 75.43.]

75.40.

When the period for claiming exemption has expired, and any exemptions have been processed, the assessor shall transmit the supplemental assessment to the auditor including the following information:

(a) Name and address, if known, of the assessee.

(b) The parcel number or legal description of the property.

(c) The tax rate area in which the property is located.

(d) The new
 base year value of the property with the value for the land separated from the value for improvements.

(e) The value of the property on the current roll, or the roll being prepared, or both.

(f) The exemption applicable, if any.

(g) The net supplemental assessment after exemption.

(h) The date of the change of ownership or completion of new construction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 946, Sec. 11.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

75.41.

(a) The auditor shall apply the current year’s tax rate, as defined in Section 75.4, to the supplemental assessment or assessments, computing the amount of taxes that would be due for a full year. If the tax rate for the “roll being prepared” is known, the rate may be used with respect to the fiscal year to which it applies, rather than the current year’s tax rate as defined in Section 75.4. If the tax rate for the “roll being prepared” is not known, the current year’s tax rate as defined in Section 75.4 shall be used. For property on the
 supplemental roll, the taxes due shall be computed in two equal installments.

(b) The taxes due shall be adjusted by a proration factor to reflect the portion of the tax year remaining as determined by the date on which the change in ownership occurred or the new construction was completed. In computing the portion of the tax year remaining, the change in ownership or completion of new construction shall be presumed to have occurred on the first day of the month following the date on which change in ownership or completion of new construction occurred.

(c) (1) If the presumed date specified in subdivision (b) is February 1, the taxes on the supplemental assessment for the current roll shall be multiplied by 0.42, and the taxes on the supplemental assessment for the roll being prepared shall be multiplied by 1.00.

(2) If the presumed date specified in subdivision (b) is March 1, the taxes on the supplemental assessment for the current roll shall be multiplied by 0.33, and the taxes on the supplemental assessment for the roll being prepared shall be multiplied by 1.00.

(3) If the presumed date specified in subdivision (b) is April 1, the taxes on the supplemental assessment for the current roll shall be multiplied by 0.25, and the taxes on the supplemental assessment for the roll being prepared shall be multiplied by 1.00.

(4) If the presumed date specified in subdivision (b) is May 1, the taxes on the supplemental assessment for the current roll shall be multiplied by 0.17, and the taxes on the supplemental assessment for the roll being prepared shall be multiplied by 1.00.

(5) If the presumed date specified in subdivision (b) is June 1, the taxes on the supplemental assessment for the current roll shall be multiplied by 0.08, and the taxes on the supplemental assessment for the roll being prepared shall be multiplied by 1.00.

(6) If the presumed date specified in subdivision (b) is July 1, no supplemental assessment shall be made on the current roll, and the taxes on the supplemental assessment for the roll being prepared shall be multiplied by 1.00.

(7) If the presumed date specified in subdivision (b) is on or after August 1, and on or before January 1, the following table of factors shall be used:The taxes on the supplementalIf the presumedassessment on the currentdate is:roll shall be multiplied by:August 1 0.92September 1 0.83October 1 0.75November 1 0.67December 1 0.58January 1 0.50(d) After computing the supplemental taxes due, if the total is twenty dollars ($20) or less, the auditor may cancel the amount as provided by Section 4986.8.

(e) If the supplemental assessment is a negative amount, the auditor shall follow the procedures of this section to determine the amount of refund to which the assessee may be entitled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

75.42.

The information transmitted to the auditor by the assessor, together with the extended taxes due, or extension of the refund, shall be enrolled on the supplemental roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 946, Sec. 13.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

75.43.

(a) If a refund is due the assessee, the auditor shall make the refund within 90 days of the date of enrollment of the negative assessment on the supplemental roll. Refunds shall be made from taxes collected on assessments made on the supplemental roll.

(b) If the refund is not made as provided in subdivision (a), interest shall be paid at a rate provided by Section 5151, computed from a date 30 days after the date of enrollment of the negative assessment to the date the refund is mailed when the interest is ten dollars ($10) or more on amounts refunded under Section
 5096.

(c) Refunds made under this chapter shall be limited to the amount by which the tax, penalty, or interest paid exceeds the amount of tax, penalty, or interest which is lawfully due and owing based upon the new base year value.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 608, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Collection of Supplemental Taxes [75.50. - 75.55.]

75.50.

The auditor shall transmit supplemental assessments entered on the supplemental roll to the tax collector for preparation of supplemental tax bills, and charge the tax collector with the taxes extended thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 946, Sec. 16.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

75.51.

The tax collector shall mail or electronically transmit a supplemental tax bill to the assessee, including the following information either on the bill or in a separate statement accompanying the bill:

(a) The information supplied by the assessor to the auditor pursuant to Section 75.40.

(b) The amount of the supplemental taxes due.

(c) The date the notice is mailed.

(d) The date on which the taxes will become delinquent and the penalties for delinquency.

(e) A statement that the supplemental taxes were determined in accordance with Article XIIIA of the California Constitution which generally requires reappraisal of property whenever a change in ownership occurs or property is newly constructed.

(f) The tax rates or the dollar amounts of taxes levied by each revenue district and taxing agency on the property covered by the tax bill.

(g) All of the following:

(1) Information specifying that if the taxpayer disagrees with a change in the assessed value as shown on the tax bill, the taxpayer has the right to an informal assessment review by contacting the assessor’s office.

(2) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), information specifying that if the taxpayer and the assessor are unable to agree on proper assessed value pursuant to an informal assessment review, the taxpayer has the right to file an application for reduction in assessment for the following year with the county board of equalization or the assessment appeals board, as applicable, and the time period during which the application will be accepted.

(B) For counties in which the board of supervisors has adopted the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 1605, information advising that the assessee has a right to appeal the supplemental assessment, and that the appeal is required to be filed within 60 days of the date of the mailing or electronic transmittal of the tax bill. For the purposes of equalization proceedings, the supplemental assessment shall be considered an assessment made outside of the regular assessment period as provided in Section 1605.

(3) The address of the clerk of the county board of equalization or the assessment appeals board, as applicable, at which forms for an application for reduction may be obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

75.52.

(a) Taxes on the supplemental bill are due on the date mailed and shall become delinquent as follows:

(1) If the bill is mailed within the months of July through October, the first installment shall become delinquent at 5 p.m. on December 10 of the same year. The second installment shall become delinquent at 5 p.m. on April 10 of the next year.

(2) If the bill is mailed within the months of November through June, the first installment shall become delinquent at 5 p.m. on the last day of the month following the month in which the bill is mailed. The second installment shall become delinquent at 5 p.m. on the last day of the fourth calendar month following the date the first installment is delinquent.

(b) If the taxes due are not paid on or before the date and time they become delinquent, a penalty of 10 percent shall attach to them.

(c) The cost enumerated in Section 2621 shall be collected after the second installment is delinquent.

(d) If a delinquent date specified in subdivision (a) falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the time of delinquency is at 5 p.m. or at the close of business, whichever is later, on the next following business day. If the board of supervisors, by adoption of an ordinance or resolution, closes the county’s offices for business prior to the time of delinquency on the “next business day” or for that whole day, that day shall be considered a legal holiday for purposes of this section.

(e) (1) The penalty imposed for delinquent taxes as provided by this article shall be canceled if the assessee or fee owner demonstrates to the tax collector that the delinquency is due to the tax collector’s failure to mail or electronically transmit the tax bill to the address provided on the tax roll or electronic address provided and authorized by the taxpayer or fee owner to the tax collector. Penalties imposed may be canceled if the board of supervisors, upon recommendation of the tax collector, has authorized the tax collector to establish, and the tax collector has so established, specific procedures for the consideration of penalty cancellations. Those procedures may provide that penalties imposed may be canceled by resolution of the county board of supervisors upon the recommendation of the tax collector if the assessee or fee owner demonstrate to the tax collector that the delinquency is due to the county’s failure to send a notice of taxes to the owner of property acquired after the lien date on the secured roll, provided payment of the amount of taxes due, minus any penalties and costs, is made no later than June 30 of the fiscal year in which the property owner is named as the assessee for taxes coming due.

(2) With respect to a late, amended, or corrected tax bill, the penalties imposed for delinquent taxes shall be canceled if the tax amount is paid within 30 days following the date that bill is mailed or electronically transmitted.

(3) Under no circumstance shall a taxpayer have fewer than 30 days to pay without penalty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 340, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

75.53.

If all delinquent amounts which are a lien on real property are not paid in full by the time fixed in the publication of the notice of impending default for failure to pay real property taxes next following the date of delinquency of the second installment of the supplemental taxes, the property shall be subject to the provisions of Section 3436.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1420, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

75.54.

(a) Taxes on the supplemental roll become a lien against the real property on the date of the change in ownership or completion of new construction unless by other provisions of law the taxes are not a lien on real property.

(b) With respect to taxes that are not a lien on real property that have become delinquent on the supplemental roll, the tax collector may use the procedures applicable to the collection of delinquent taxes on the unsecured roll for collection of the tax. If taxes that are not a lien on real property remain unpaid at the time set for declaration of tax default, following a delinquency in the payment of the second installment of the taxes, the taxes and any penalties and costs thereon shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in the event there is a subsequent change in ownership following an initial change in ownership or completion of new construction, that occurs before the mailing of the supplemental tax billing attributable to the initial change in ownership or completion of new construction, then the lien for supplemental taxes is extinguished and that portion of the supplemental assessment attributable to the assessee from the date of the initial change in ownership or completion of new construction to the date of the subsequent change in ownership shall be entered on the unsecured roll or on the supplemental roll as an unsecured assessment in the name of the person who would have been the assessee if the additional change in ownership had not occurred, and thereafter that portion of the tax shall be treated and collected like other taxes on the unsecured roll. The remaining portion of the supplemental tax attributable to the initial change in ownership becomes a lien against the real property on the date of the subsequent change in ownership which lien shall also secure any increase or decrease in supplemental taxes resulting from the determination of the new base year value required to be made following the subsequent change in ownership.

(d) In lieu of determining, as provided in subdivision (c), the portion of the supplemental assessment attributable to the person who would have been the assessee if the additional change in ownership had not occurred, a county may elect to compute that portion of the supplemental assessment attributable to the assessee from the first day of the month following the date of the initial change in ownership or completion of new construction to the date of the subsequent change in ownership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 800, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

75.55.

(a) A county board of supervisors may, by ordinance, provide for the cancellation of any supplemental tax bill in which the amount of taxes to be billed is less than the cost of assessing and collecting them. In no event shall any supplemental tax bill be canceled pursuant to this subdivision if the amount of taxes on that bill exceeds fifty dollars ($50).

(b) Except where a county board of supervisors has adopted an ordinance pursuant to subdivision (a), a county board of supervisors may, by ordinance, provide for the cancellation by the assessor of any supplemental assessment where that assessment would result in an amount of taxes due which is less than the cost of assessing and collecting them. In no event shall any supplemental assessment be canceled pursuant to this subdivision if the amount of taxes resulting from that supplemental assessment would exceed fifty dollars ($50).

(c) Notwithstanding this section, no taxable real property shall be exempt from property taxes assessed on the lien date, as provided in Section 2192, unless the property is otherwise exempt under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 775, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6.5. Reimbursement for County Costs [75.60. - 75.66.]

75.60.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board of supervisors of an eligible county or city and county, upon the adoption of a method identifying the actual administrative costs associated with the supplemental assessment roll, may direct the county auditor to allocate to the county or city and county, prior to the allocation of property tax revenues pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) and prior to the allocation made pursuant to Section 75.70, an amount equal to the actual administrative costs, but not to exceed 5 percent of the revenues that have been collected on or after January 1, 1987, due to the assessments under this chapter. Those revenues shall be used solely for the purpose of administration of this chapter, regardless of the date those costs are incurred.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Actual administrative costs” includes only those direct costs for administration, data processing, collection, and appeal that are incurred by county auditors, assessors, and tax collectors. “Actual administrative costs” also includes those indirect costs for administration, data processing, collections, and appeal that are incurred by county auditors, assessors, and tax collectors and are allowed by state and federal audit standards pursuant to the A-87 Cost Allocation Program.

(2) “Eligible county or city and county” means a county or city and county that has been certified by the State Board of Equalization as an eligible county or city and county. The State Board of Equalization shall certify a county or city and county as an eligible county or city and county only if both of the following are determined to exist:

(A) The average assessment level in the county or city and county is at least 95 percent of the assessment level required by statute, as determined by the board’s most recent survey of that county or city and county performed pursuant to Section 15640 of the Government Code.

(B) For any survey of a county assessment roll for the 1996–97 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, the sum of the absolute values of the differences from the statutorily required assessment level described in subparagraph (A) does not exceed 7.5 percent of the total amount of the county’s or city and county’s statutorily required assessed value, as determined pursuant to the board’s survey described in subparagraph (A).

(3) Each certification of a county or city and county shall be valid only until the next survey made by the board. If a county or city and county has been certified following a survey that includes a sampling of assessments, the board may continue to certify that county or city and county following a survey that does not include sampling if the board finds in the survey conducted without sampling that there are no significant assessment problems in the county or city and county. The board shall, by regulation, define “significant assessment problems” for purposes of this section, and that definition shall include objective standards to measure performance. If the board finds in the survey conducted without sampling that significant assessment problems exist, the board shall conduct a sampling of assessments in that county or city and county to determine if it is an eligible county or city and county. If a county or city and county is not certified by the board, it may request a new survey in advance of the regularly scheduled survey, provided that it agrees to pay for the cost of the survey.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

75.65.

(a) There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Supplemental Roll Administrative Cost Fund (hereafter referred to as “the fund”), which is hereby created, the sum of ten million seventy-five thousand four hundred ninety dollars ($10,075,490).

(b) Money in the fund shall be allocated to counties to pay for the costs of administering this chapter in the 1983–84 fiscal year, where such costs are in excess of the amount of property tax revenue allocated for administrative costs pursuant to Section 75.60.

(c) The Controller shall allocate those funds upon certification by the board and the Department of Finance that the claim by the county for reimbursement of excess administrative cost is predicated on prudent administrative practice and does not incorporate expenses which are not essential to the administration of this chapter.

(d) Counties may submit claims for reimbursement for excess administrative costs of administering the provisions of this chapter to the board no later than January 15, 1984. The board shall review those claims and forward them with recommendations to the Department of Finance by March 1, 1984. If approved by the Department of Finance, the claim shall be submitted to the Controller for payment from the fund. The claim shall be paid no later than April 15, 1984.

(e) The Department of Finance shall develop guidelines for county claims pursuant to this article, which shall be developed in consultation with the board and with representatives of county assessors, county auditors and county tax collectors. The guidelines shall be issued by December 1, 1983.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 846, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

75.66.

It is the intent of the Legislature that no further appropriation shall be made, other than that provided by Section 75.65, and no reimbursement is required by this chapter pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIIIB of the California Constitution or Section 2231, because the county has authority pursuant to Section 75.60 to allocate additional revenues generated pursuant to this chapter to pay for administrative costs mandated by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1102, Sec. 16.5.   Effective September 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Disposition of Revenues [75.70. - 75.72.]

75.70.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, for the 1983–84 fiscal year, each county auditor shall allocate to all elementary, high school, and unified school districts within the county in proportion to each school district’s average daily attendance, as certified by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for purposes of the advance apportionment of state aid in the then current fiscal year, without respect to the allocation of property tax revenues pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5, and without respect to allocation and payment of funds as provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code, an amount equal to the additional revenues generated by the rate levied pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution applied to the increased assessments for the current roll under this chapter. Additional revenues generated by a rate or rates levied in excess of the limitation prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution shall be allocated to the fund for which the tax rate or rates were levied.

(b) For the 1984–85 fiscal year, the county auditor shall, without respect to the allocation of property tax revenues pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5, do all of the following:

(1) Make the allocation and payment of funds as provided in Section 33670 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Allocate to the county the amount determined pursuant to Section 75.60.

(3) Allocate to the county an amount equal to the total amount of additional revenues generated by the rate levied pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution applied to the increased assessments under this chapter, less the amount determined pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), the remainder multiplied by the county’s property tax apportionment factor determined pursuant to Section 97.5.

(4) Allocate to each community college district and county superintendent of schools within the county an amount equal to the total amount of additional revenues generated by the rate levied pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution applied to the increased assessments under this chapter, less the amount determined pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), the
 remainder multiplied by each county superintendent of schools’ and community college district’s property tax apportionment factor determined pursuant to Section 97.5.

(5) Allocate to each city within the county an amount equal to the total amount of additional revenue generated by the rate levied pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution applied to the increased assessments under this chapter, less the amount determined pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), the remainder multiplied by each city’s property tax apportionment factor determined pursuant to Section 97.5.

(6) Allocate to each special district within the county an amount equal to the total amount of additional revenues generated by the rate levied pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California
 Constitution applied to the increased assessments under this chapter, less the amount determined pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), the remainder multiplied by each special district’s property tax apportionment factor determined pursuant to Section 97.5. The amount allocated to each special district which is governed by the board of supervisors of a county or whose governing board is the same as the board of supervisors of a county, shall be subject to Section 98.6.

(7) Allocate the remaining revenues generated by the rate levied pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution applied to the increased assessments under this chapter to all elementary, high school, and unified school districts within the county in proportion to each school district’s average daily attendance, as certified by the Superintendent of Public Instruction for purposes of the advance apportionment of
 state aid in the then current fiscal year.

(8) Allocate additional revenues generated by a rate levied in excess of the limitation prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution to the fund or funds for which the tax rate or rates were levied.

These allocations shall be made on a timely basis but no later than 30 calendar days after the close of the preceding monthly or four-weekly accounting period.

(c) For the 1985–86 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, the county auditor shall, without respect to the allocation of property tax revenues pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5, do all of the following:

(1) Make the allocation and payment of funds as provided in Section
 33670 of the Health and Safety Code.
